utilities/dictionaries/lv_LV-Latvian.aff
SFX < Y 29
SFX < ties jos      ties
SFX < ties jies     ties
SFX < ties jas      ties
SFX < ties jamies   ties
SFX < ties jaties   ties
SFX < ties jās      ties
SFX < ties jāmies   ties
SFX < ties jāties   ties
SFX < ties šos      ties
SFX < ties sies     ties
SFX < ties simies   ties
SFX < ties sieties  ties
SFX < ties sities   ties
SFX < ties jieties  ties
SFX < ties tos      ties
SFX < ties joties   ties
SFX < ties šoties   ties
SFX < ties damies   ties
SFX < ties damās    ties
SFX < ties jošies   ties
SFX < ties jošos    ties
SFX < ties jošās    ties
SFX < ties jusies   ties
SFX < ties jušies   ties
SFX < ties jušos    ties
SFX < ties jušās    ties
SFX < ties šanos    ties
SFX < ties šanās    ties
SFX < ties jas/]|   ties  is:0xtav

SFX > Y 53
SFX > āties  os     [ā]ties
SFX > āties  ies    [ā]ties
SFX > āties  ās     [ā]ties
SFX > āties  āmies  [ā]ties
SFX > āties  āties  [ā]ties
SFX > āties  ieties [ā]ties
SFX > āties  oties  [ā]ties
SFX > āties  ošies  [ā]ties
SFX > āties  ošos   [ā]ties
SFX > āties  ošās   [ā]ties
SFX > āties  ās/]|  [ā]ties  is:0xtav
SFX > ēties  os     [ē]ties
SFX > ēties  ies    [ē]ties
SFX > ēties  as     [ē]ties
SFX > ēties  amies  [ē]ties
SFX > ēties  aties  [ē]ties
SFX > ēties  ieties [ē]ties
SFX > ēties  oties  [ē]ties
SFX > ēties  ošies  [ē]ties
SFX > ēties  ošos   [ē]ties
SFX > ēties  ošās   [ē]ties
SFX > ēties  as/]|  [ē]ties  is:0xtav
SFX > īties  os     [ī]ties
SFX > īties  ies    [ī]ties
SFX > īties  ās     [ī]ties
SFX > īties  āmies  [ī]ties
SFX > īties  āties  [ī]ties
SFX > īties  ieties [ī]ties
SFX > īties  oties  [ī]ties
SFX > īties  ošies  [ī]ties
SFX > īties  ošos   [ī]ties
SFX > īties  ošās   [ī]ties
SFX > īties  ās/]|  [ī]ties  is:0xtav
SFX > ies    os      [āēī]ties
SFX > ties   jos     [āēī]ties
SFX > ties   jies    [āēī]ties
SFX > ties   jās     [āēī]ties
SFX > ties   jāmies  [āēī]ties
SFX > ties   jāties  [āēī]ties
SFX > ties   šos     [āēī]ties
SFX > ties   sies    [āēī]ties
SFX > ties   sieties [āēī]ties
SFX > ties   simies  [āēī]ties
SFX > ties   sities  [āēī]ties
SFX > ties   damies  [āēī]ties
SFX > ties   damās   [āēī]ties
SFX > ties   jusies  [āēī]ties
SFX > ties   jušies  [āēī]ties
SFX > ties   jušos   [āēī]ties
SFX > ties   jušās   [āēī]ties
SFX > ties   šanos   [āēī]ties
SFX > ties   šanās   [āēī]ties
SFX > ties   šoties  [āēī]ties

SFX O Y 10
SFX O s a   [s]  is:vpg
SFX O s am  [s]  is:vpd
SFX O s u   [s]  is:vpa
SFX O s ā   [s]  is:vpl
SFX O s 0   [s]  is:vpv
SFX O š a   [š]  is:vpg
SFX O š am  [š]  is:vpd
SFX O š u   [š]  is:vpa
SFX O š ā   [š]  is:vpl
SFX O š 0   [š]  is:vpv

SFX o Y 12
SFX o s i    s  is:dpn
SFX o s iem  s  is:dpd
SFX o s us   s  is:dpa
SFX o s os   s  is:dpl
SFX o š i    š  is:dpn
SFX o š iem  š  is:dpd
SFX o š us   š  is:dpa
SFX o š os   š  is:dpl
SFX o i u    i  is:ddg
SFX o 0 em   i  is:ddd
SFX o i us   i  is:dda
SFX o i os   i  is:ddl

SFX P Y 24
SFX P s  iņš  [^gk]s  is:vdn
SFX P s  iņa  [^gk]s  is:vdg
SFX P s  iņam [^gk]s  is:vdd
SFX P s  iņu  [^gk]s  is:vda
SFX P s  iņā  [^gk]s  is:vdl
SFX P s  iņ   [^gk]s  is:vdv
SFX P gs dziņš  [g]s  is:vdn
SFX P gs dziņa  [g]s  is:vdg
SFX P gs dziņam [g]s  is:vdd
SFX P gs dziņu  [g]s  is:vda
SFX P gs dziņā  [g]s  is:vdl
SFX P gs dziņ   [g]s  is:vdv
SFX P ks ciņš   [k]s  is:vdn
SFX P ks ciņa   [k]s  is:vdg
SFX P ks ciņam  [k]s  is:vdd
SFX P ks ciņu   [k]s  is:vda
SFX P ks ciņā   [k]s  is:vdl
SFX P ks ciņ    [k]s  is:vdv
SFX P š  iņš   [š]    is:vdn
SFX P š  iņa   [š]    is:vdg
SFX P š  iņam  [š]    is:vdd
SFX P š  iņu   [š]    is:vda
SFX P š  iņā   [š]    is:vdl
SFX P š  iņ    [š]    is:vdv

SFX p Y 16
SFX p s   iņi   [^gk]s  is:ddn
SFX p s   iņiem [^gk]s  is:ddd
SFX p s   iņus  [^gk]s  is:dda
SFX p s   iņos  [^gk]s  is:ddl
SFX p gs  dziņi   [g]s  is:ddn
SFX p gs  dziņiem [g]s  is:ddd
SFX p gs  dziņus  [g]s  is:dda
SFX p gs  dziņos  [g]s  is:ddl
SFX p ks  ciņi    [k]s  is:ddn
SFX p ks  ciņiem  [k]s  is:ddd
SFX p ks  ciņus   [k]s  is:dda
SFX p ks  ciņos   [k]s  is:ddl
SFX p š   iņi     [š]   is:ddn
SFX p š   iņiem   [š]   is:ddd
SFX p š   iņus    [š]   is:dda
SFX p š   iņos    [š]   is:ddl

SFX x Y 18
SFX x  gs  ģe/Ss         [o]gs  is:vpn po:lietv5r
SFX x  ks  ce/Ss         nieks  is:vpn po:lietv5r
SFX x  s   e/Ss      [flrstz]s  is:vpn po:lietv5r
SFX x  is  e/Ss     [bķlnprt]is  is:vpn po:lietv5r
SFX x  s   e/Ss  [aāeodt][nr]s  is:vpn po:lietv5r
SFX x  s   a/Ss           [j]s
SFX x e es e is:vpg
SFX x e em e is:vpd
SFX x e i  e is:vpa
SFX x e ē  e is:vpl
SFX x e ēm e is:dpd
SFX x e ēs e is:dpl
SFX x a as a is:vpg
SFX x a am a is:vpd
SFX x a u  a is:vpa
SFX x a ā  a is:vpl
SFX x a ām a is:dpd
SFX x a ās a is:dpl

SFX Q Y 27
SFX Q is   a   [^bcdlmnpvtsz]is is:vpg
SFX Q is   ja  [bpmv]is is:vpg
SFX Q cis  ča  [c]is    is:vpg
SFX Q dis  ža  [d]is    is:vpg
SFX Q sis  ša  [s]is    is:vpg
SFX Q tis  ša  [^as][t]is is:vpg
SFX Q is   a   [a][t]is   is:vpg
SFX Q is   a   [s][t]is   is:vpg
SFX Q zis  ža  [z]is      is:vpg
SFX Q nis  ņa  [^lsz][n]is is:vpg
SFX Q lis  ļa  [^lsz][l]is is:vpg
SFX Q lnis ļņa [l]nis   is:vpg
SFX Q snis šņa [s]nis   is:vpg
SFX Q znis žņa [z]nis   is:vpg
SFX Q llis ļļa [l]lis   is:vpg
SFX Q nnis ņņa [n]nis   is:vpg
SFX Q slis šļa [s]lis   is:vpg
SFX Q zlis žļa [z]lis   is:vpg
SFX Q s    m   [i]s   is:vpd
SFX Q s    0   [i]s   is:vpa
SFX Q is   ī   [i]s   is:vpl
SFX Q ns   ņa  [n]s   is:vpg
SFX Q ls   ļa  [l]s   is:vpg
SFX Q ss   ša  [s]s   is:vpg
SFX Q s    im  [lns]s   is:vpd
SFX Q s    i   [lns]s   is:vpa
SFX Q s    ī   [lns]s   is:vpl
